Missouri, session 2026, SB1651.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 278, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 278.115, to read as
follows:
278.115. Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule,
order, decision, permit, agreement, or other relevant
authority to the contrary, an employee of a soil and water
conservation district created under this chapter shall be
subject to the same healthcare benefits and rates as a state
employee subject to the provisions of chapter 103.
✓